Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 13 Primary Voting Lists

17-13-1.
Preparation and posting of preliminary lists.

In conformity with the requirements of chapter 10 of this title relating to preliminary lists generally, preceding the next primary election of a political party prior to a general election, each local board shall, for the party, prepare and post in the local board of canvassers a separate list of voters with their addresses in the districts who are eligible to participate in the primary of the respective party in accordance with the provisions of chapter 15 of this title. Each list shall be plainly marked with the name of the party for which it is prepared.

In the preparation of any preliminary list, the names of all persons who are ineligible by reason of the provisions of §

17-15-24

shall be stricken from the list, and those persons are debarred from participating in the primary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 18; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-13-2

; G.L. 1956, §

17-13-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 87, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 96, § 2.

17-13-2.
Affidavits of error in lists.

Any person claiming that his or her name has been erroneously included in or omitted from a preliminary list may set up that fact in his or her affidavit and, if that person files the affidavit with the proper local board within five (5) days after the preliminary list has been posted, as provided in §

17-13-1

, the local board shall make the proper change in the list if satisfied of the proof of the claim. The affidavit shall be open to public inspection under any regulations that shall be promulgated by the local board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 18; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-13-3

; G.L. 1956, §

17-13-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-13-3.
Procedure in primaries for special elections.

The same procedure and sequence shall be followed in the case of a primary for a special election, but the state board shall fix and publish the various dates and periods in the sequence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 18; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-13-5

; G.L. 1956, §

17-13-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-13-4.
Consolidated list for each party.

There shall be only one list prepared for each party and the practice of separate lists prepared for women and for real, personal, and registry voters shall not be followed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 18; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-13-6; G.L. 1956, §

17-13-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-13-5.
Lists furnished to parties and candidates.

After the first meeting held to correct and add to the voting lists as required by this chapter, the local boards shall immediately furnish five (5) complete copies of the printed lists to the town or city chairperson of each political party. The local boards shall furnish certified copies of the primary lists to any political party or candidate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 18; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-13-7; G.L. 1956, §

17-13-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.